Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.217

Children of military families—Continued enrollment in district schools.

(1) A student shall be permitted to remain enrolled in the school in which the student was enrolled while residing with the custodial parent if the student:

(a) Meets the definition of a child of a military family in transition under Article II of RCW 28A.705.010; and

(b) Is placed in the care of a noncustodial parent or guardian when the custodial parent is required to relocate due to military orders.

(2) A nonresident school district shall not be required to provide transportation to and from the school unless otherwise required by state or federal law.

[ 2009 c 380 s 8.]